Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1741.07
Handicapped parking infractions; sections, how construed.

Sections 18-1741.01 to 18-1741.07 shall not be construed to affect the rights, lawful procedures, or responsibilities of peace officers or law enforcement agencies using the handicapped parking citation for handicapped parking infractions.

Laws 1993, LB 632, § 7.